North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 7A. Registration of Voters.
§ 163-82.18.
Appeal from denial of registration.

Right to Appeal. — Any applicant who receives notice of denial of registration pursuant to

G.S. 163-82.7

may appeal the denial within five days after receipt of the notice of denial. The county board of elections shall promptly set a date for a public hearing. The notice of appeal shall be in writing and shall be signed
by the appealing party, shall include the appealing party’s name, date of birth, address, and reasons for the appeal.

Hearing Before County Board of Elections. — The county board of elections shall set a date and time for a public hearing and shall notify the appealing party. Every person appealing to the county board of elections from denial of registration shall be
entitled to a prompt and fair hearing on the question of the denied applicant’s right and qualifications to register as a voter. All cases on appeal to a county board of elections shall be heard de novo.Two members of the county
board of elections shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of hearing appeals on questions of registration. The decision of a majority of the members of the board shall be the decision of the board. The board shall be authorized
to subpoena witnesses and to compel their attendance and testimony under oath, and it is further authorized to subpoena papers and documents relevant to any matters pending before the board.If at the hearing the board shall find
that the person appealing from a denial of registration meets all requirements of law for registration as a voter in the county, the board shall enter an order directing that the appellant be registered and assign the appellant
to the appropriate precinct. Not later than five days after an appeal is heard before the county board of elections, the board shall give written notice of its decision to the appealing party.

Appeal to Superior Court. — Any person aggrieved by a final decision of a county board of elections denying registration may at any time within 10 days from the date on which he receives notice of the decision appeal to the superior court of the county
in which the board is located. Upon such an appeal, the appealing party shall be the plaintiff and the county board of elections shall be the defendant, and the matter shall be heard de novo in the superior court in the manner
in which other civil actions are tried and disposed of in that court.If the decision of the court is that the order of the county board of elections shall be set aside, then the court shall enter its order so providing and adjudging
that the plaintiff is entitled to be registered as a qualified voter in the precinct in which he originally made application to register, and in such case the plaintiff’s name shall be entered in the registration book of that precinct.
The court shall not order the registration of any person in a precinct in which he did not apply to register prior to the proceeding in court.From the judgment of the superior court an appeal may be taken to the appellate division
in the same manner as other appeals are taken from judgments of that court in civil actions.

History.
1957, c. 287, dd. 2-4; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1969, c. 44, s. 82; 1981, c. 542, ss. 1, 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.19.
Voter registration at drivers license offices; coordination on data interface.

Voter Registration at Drivers License Offices. — The Division of Motor Vehicles shall, pursuant to the rules adopted by the State Board of Elections, modify its forms so that any eligible person who applies for original issuance, renewal or correction
of a drivers license, or special identification card issued under

G.S. 20-37.7

may, on a part of the form, complete an application to register to vote, or to update the voter’s registration if the voter has changed his or her address or moved from one precinct to another or from one county
to another. The person taking the application shall ask if the applicant is a citizen of the United States. If the applicant states that the applicant is not a citizen of the United States, or declines to answer the question, the
person taking the application shall inform the applicant that it is a felony for a person who is not a citizen of the United States to apply to register to vote. The application shall state in clear language the penalty for violation
of this section. The necessary forms shall be prescribed by the State Board of Elections. The form must ask for the previous voter registration address of the voter, if any. If a previous address is listed, and it is not in the
county of residence of the applicant, the appropriate county board of elections shall treat the application as an authorization to cancel the previous registration and also process it as such under the procedures of

G.S. 163-82.9

. If a previous address is listed and that address is in the county where the voter applies to register, the application shall be processed as if it had been submitted under

G.S. 163-82.9

.Registration shall become effective as provided in

G.S. 163-82.7

. Applications to register to vote accepted at a drivers license office under this section until the deadline established in G.S. 163-82.6(d)(2) shall be treated as timely made for an election, and no person who
completes an application at that drivers license office shall be denied the vote in that election for failure to apply earlier than that deadline.All applications shall be forwarded by the Department of Transportation to the appropriate
board of elections not later than five business days after the date of acceptance, according to rules which shall be promulgated by the State Board of Elections. Those rules shall provide for a paperless, instant, electronic transfer
of applications to the appropriate board of elections.

Any person who willfully and knowingly and with fraudulent intent gives false information on the application [described in subsection (a) of this section] is guilty of a Class I felony.

Coordination on Data Interface. — The Department of Transportation jointly with the State Board of Elections shall develop and operate a computerized interface to match information in the database of the statewide voter registration system with the drivers
license information in the Division of Motor Vehicles to the extent required to enable the State Board of Elections and the Department of Transportation to verify the accuracy of the information provided on applications for voter
registration, whether the applications were received at drivers license offices or elsewhere. The Department of Transportation and the State Board shall implement the provisions of this subsection so as to comply with section 303
of the Help America Vote Act of 2002. The Department of Transportation shall enter into an agreement with the Commissioner of Social Security so as to comply with section 303 of the Help America Vote Act of 2002.

History.
1983, c. 854, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 19(a); 1993, c. 74, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 1998-149, s. 11.1; 2001-319, s. 7(a); 2003-226, s. 7(b); 2009-541, s. 13(a); 2013-381, s. 12.1(e);
2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-82.19. Voter registration at drivers license offices; coordination on data interface.

Voter Registration at Drivers License Offices. — The Division of Motor Vehicles shall, pursuant to the rules adopted by the State Board of Elections, modify its forms so that any eligible person who applies for original issuance, renewal or correction
of a drivers license, or special identification card issued under

G.S. 20-37.7

may, on a part of the form, complete an application to register to vote, or to update the voter’s registration if the voter has changed his or her address or moved from one precinct to another or from one county
to another, or to preregister to vote. The person taking the application shall ask if the applicant is a citizen of the United States. If the applicant states that the applicant is not a citizen of the United States, or declines
to answer the question, the person taking the application shall inform the applicant that it is a felony for a person who is not a citizen of the United States to apply to register to vote. Any person who willfully and knowingly
and with fraudulent intent gives false information on the application is guilty of a Class I felony. The application shall state in clear language the penalty for violation of this section. The necessary forms shall be prescribed
by the State Board of Elections. The form must ask for the previous voter registration address of the voter, if any. If a previous address is listed, and it is not in the county of residence of the applicant, the appropriate county
board of elections shall treat the application as an authorization to cancel the previous registration and also process it as such under the procedures of

G.S. 163-82.9

. If a previous address is listed and that address is in the county where the voter applies to register, the application shall be processed as if it had been submitted under

G.S. 163-82.9

.

Coordination on Data Interface. — The Department of Transportation jointly with the State Board of Elections shall develop and operate a computerized interface to match information in the database of the statewide voter registration system with the drivers
license information in the Division of Motor Vehicles to the extent required to enable the State Board of Elections and the Department of Transportation to verify the accuracy of the information provided on applications for voter
registration, whether the applications were received at drivers license offices or elsewhere. The Department of Transportation and the State Board shall implement the provisions of this subsection so as to comply with section 303
of the Help America Vote Act of 2002. The Department of Transportation shall enter into an agreement with the Commissioner of Social Security so as to comply with section 303 of the Help America Vote Act of 2002.

Registration shall become effective as provided in

G.S. 163-82.7

. Applications to register to vote accepted at a drivers license office under this section until the deadline established in G.S. 163-82.6(c)(2) shall be treated as timely made for an election, and no person who completes
an application at that drivers license office shall be denied the vote in that election for failure to apply earlier than that deadline.

All applications shall be forwarded by the Department of Transportation to the appropriate board of elections not later than five business days after the date of acceptance, according to rules which shall be promulgated by the State Board of Elections.
Those rules shall provide for a paperless, instant, electronic transfer of applications to the appropriate board of elections. Applications for preregistration to vote shall be forwarded to the State Board of Elections.

§ 163-82.20.
Voter registration at other public agencies.

Voter Registration Agencies. — Every office in this State which accepts:

Applications for a program of public assistance under Article 2 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes or under Article 13 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes;

Applications for State-funded State or local government programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities, with such office designated by the State Board of Elections; or

Claims for benefits under Chapter 96 of the General Statutes, the Employment Security Law, is designated as a voter registration agency for purposes of this section.

Duties of Voter Registration Agencies. — A voter registration agency described in subsection (a) of this section shall, unless the applicant declines, in writing, to register to vote:

Distribute with each application for service or assistance, and with each recertification, renewal, or change of address relating to such service or assistance:

The voter registration application form described in G.S. 163-82.3(a) or (b); or

The voter registration agency’s own form, if it is substantially equivalent to the form described in G.S. 163-82.3(a) or (b) and has been approved by the State Board of Elections, provided that the agency’s own form may be a detachable part of the agency’s
paper application or may be a paperless computer process, as long as the applicant is required to sign an attestation as part of the application to register.

Provide a form that contains the elements required by section 7(a)(6)(B) of the National Voter Registration Act; and

Provide to each applicant who does not decline to register to vote the same degree of assistance with regard to the completion of the registration application as is provided by the office with regard to the completion of its own forms.

Provided that voter registration agencies designated under subdivision (a)(3) of this section shall only be required to provide the services set out in this subsection to applicants for new claims, reopened claims, and changes of address under Chapter
96 of the General Statutes, the Employment Security Law.

Home Registration for Disabled. — If a voter registration agency provides services to a person with disability at the person’s home, the voter registration agency shall provide the services described in subsection (b) of this section at the person’s
home.

Prohibitions. — Any person providing any service under subsection (b) of this section shall not:

Seek to influence an applicant’s political preference or party registration, except that this shall not be construed to prevent the notice provided by G.S. 163-82.4(d) to be given if the applicant refuses to declare his party affiliation;

Display any such political preference or party allegiance;

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose or effect of which is to discourage the applicant from registering to vote; or

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose or effect of which is to lead the applicant to believe that a decision to register or not to register has any bearing on the availability of services or benefits.

Confidentiality of Declination to Register. — No information relating to a declination to register to vote in connection with an application made at a voter registration agency may be used for any purpose other than voter registration.

Transmittal From Agency to Board of Elections. — Any voter registration application completed at a voter registration agency shall be accepted by that agency in lieu of the applicant’s mailing the application. Any such application so received shall be
transmitted to the appropriate board of elections not later than five business days after acceptance, according to rules which shall be promulgated by the State Board of Elections.

Twenty-Five-Day Deadline for an Election. — Applications to register accepted by a voter registration agency shall entitle a registrant to vote in any primary, general, or special election unless the registrant shall have made application later than
the twenty-fifth calendar day immediately preceding such primary, general, or special election, provided that nothing shall prohibit voter registration agencies from continuing to accept applications during that period.

Ineligible Applications Prohibited. — No person shall make application to register to vote under this section if that person is ineligible on account of age, citizenship, lack of residence for the period of time provided by law, or because of conviction
of a felony.

History.
1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 1995, c. 507, s. 25.10(c); 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 608, s. 1; 2009-541, s. 14(a); 2013-381, s. 12.1(f); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-82.20. Voter registration at other public agencies.

Voter Registration Agencies. — Every office in this State which accepts:

Applications for a program of public assistance under Article 2 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes or under Article 13 of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes;

Applications for State-funded State or local government programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities, with such office designated by the State Board of Elections; or

Claims for benefits under Chapter 96 of the General Statutes, the Employment Security Law, is designated as a voter registration agency for purposes of this section.

Duties of Voter Registration Agencies. — A voter registration agency described in subsection (a) of this section shall, unless the applicant declines, in writing, to register or preregister to vote:

Distribute with each application for service or assistance, and with each recertification, renewal, or change of address relating to such service or assistance:

The voter registration application form described in G.S. 163-82.3(a) or (b); or

The voter registration agency’s own form, if it is substantially equivalent to the form described in G.S. 163-82.3(a) or (b) and has been approved by the State Board of Elections, provided that the agency’s own form may be a detachable part of the agency’s
paper application or may be a paperless computer process, as long as the applicant is required to sign an attestation as part of the application to register or preregister.

Provide a form that contains the elements required by section 7(a)(6)(B) of the National Voter Registration Act; and

Provide to each applicant who does not decline to register or preregister to vote the same degree of assistance with regard to the completion of the registration application as is provided by the office with regard to the completion of its own forms.

Provided that voter registration agencies designated under subdivision (a)(3) of this section shall only be required to provide the services set out in this subsection to applicants for new claims, reopened claims, and changes of address under Chapter
96 of the General Statutes, the Employment Security Law.

Home Registration for Disabled. — If a voter registration agency provides services to a person with disability at the person’s home, the voter registration agency shall provide the services described in subsection (b) of this section at the person’s home.

Prohibitions. — Any person providing any service under subsection (b) of this section shall not:

Seek to influence an applicant’s political preference or party registration, except that this shall not be construed to prevent the notice provided by G.S. 163-82.4(c) to be given if the applicant refuses to declare his party affiliation;

Display any such political preference or party allegiance;

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose or effect of which is to discourage the applicant from registering or preregistering to vote; or

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action the purpose or effect of which is to lead the applicant to believe that a decision to register or preregister or not to register or preregister has any bearing on the availability of services or benefits.

Confidentiality of Declination to Register. — No information relating to a declination to register or preregister to vote in connection with an application made at a voter registration agency may be used for any purpose other than voter registration.

Transmittal From Agency to Board of Elections. — Any voter registration or preregistration application completed at a voter registration agency shall be accepted by that agency in lieu of the applicant’s mailing the application. Any such application so
received shall be transmitted to the appropriate board of elections not later than five business days after acceptance, according to rules which shall be promulgated by the State Board of Elections.

Twenty-Five-Day Deadline for an Election. — Applications to register accepted by a voter registration agency shall entitle a registrant to vote in any primary, general, or special election unless the registrant shall have made application later than the
twenty-fifth calendar day immediately preceding such primary, general, or special election, provided that nothing shall prohibit voter registration agencies from continuing to accept applications during that period.

Ineligible Applications Prohibited. — No person shall make application to register or preregister to vote under this section if that person is ineligible on account of age, citizenship, lack of residence for the period of time provided by law, or because
of conviction of a felony.

§ 163-82.20A.
Voter registration upon restoration of citizenship. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The State Board of Elections, the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall jointly develop and implement educational programs and procedures for persons to
apply to register to vote at the time they are restored to citizenship and all filings required have been completed under Chapter 13 of the General Statutes. Those procedures shall be designed to do both of the following:

Inform the person that the restoration of rights removes the person’s disqualification from voting, but that in order to vote the person must register to vote.

Provide an opportunity to that person to register to vote.

At a minimum, the program shall include a written notice to the person whose citizenship has been restored, informing that person that the person may now register to vote, with a voter registration form enclosed with the notice.

History.
2007-391, s. 26(a); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-6, s. 3; 2017-186, s. 2(lllllllll); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 163-82.20

A.

§ 163-82.20A.
Voter registration upon restoration of citizenship. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The State Board of Elections, the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall jointly develop and implement educational programs and procedures for persons to apply to register to vote at
the time they are restored to citizenship and all filings required have been completed under Chapter 13 of the General Statutes. Those procedures shall be designed to do both of the following:

Inform the person that the restoration of rights removes the person’s disqualification from voting, but that in order to vote the person must register to vote.

Provide an opportunity to that person to register to vote.

At a minimum, the program shall include a written notice to the person whose citizenship has been restored, informing that person that the person may now register to vote, with a voter registration form enclosed with the notice.

History.
2007-391, s. 26(a); 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-6, s. 3; 2017-186, s. 2(lllllllll); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 163-82.20

A.

§ 163-82.21.
Voter registration at military recruitment offices.

The Executive Director, jointly with the Department of Defense, shall develop and implement procedures for persons to apply to register to vote at recruitment offices of the Armed Forces of the United States in compliance with section 7(c) of the National
Voter Registration Act.

History.
1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 2001-319, s. 11; 2011-183, s. 111; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.22.
Voter registration at public libraries and public agencies.

Every library covered by

G.S. 153A-272

shall make available to the public the application forms described in

G.S. 163-82.3

, and shall keep a sufficient supply of the forms so that they are always available. Every library covered by

G.S. 153A-272

shall designate at least one employee to assist voter registration applicants in completing the form during all times that the library is open.

If approved by the State Board of Elections, the county board of elections, and the county board of commissioners, a county may offer voter registration in accordance with this section through the following additional public offices:

Senior centers or facilities operated by the county.

Parks and recreation services operated by the county.

History.
1975, c. 234, s. 1; 1977, c. 626, s. 1; 1983, c. 588, ss. 2, 3; c. 707; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 973, ss. 1, 2; c. 1044, s. 19(b); 1993, c. 74, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 2013-381, s. 5.1; 2017-6, s.
3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.23.
Voter registration at public high schools.

Every public high school shall make available to its students and others who are eligible to register to vote the application forms described in

G.S. 163-82.3

, and shall keep a sufficient supply of the forms so that they are always available. A local board of education may, but is not required to, designate high school employees to assist in completing the forms. Only employees
who volunteer for this duty may be designated by boards of education.

History.
1975, c. 234, s. 1; 1977, c. 626, s. 1; 1983, c. 588, ss. 2, 3; c. 707; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 973, ss. 1, 2; c. 1044, s. 19(b); 1993, c. 74, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 2009-541, s. 15(a); 2013-381,
s. 12.1(d); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-82.23. Voter registration at public high schools.

Every public high school shall make available to its students and others who are eligible to register and preregister to vote the application forms described in

G.S. 163-82.3

, and shall keep a sufficient supply of the forms so that they are always available. A local board of education may, but is not required to, designate high school employees to assist in completing the forms. Only employees
who volunteer for this duty may be designated by boards of education.

§ 163-82.24.
Statewide training and certification for election officials.

Training. — The State Board of Elections shall conduct training programs in election law and procedures. Every county elections director shall receive training conducted by the State Board at least as often as required in the following schedule:

Once during each odd-numbered year before the municipal election held in the county;

Once during each even-numbered year before the first partisan primary; and

Once during each even-numbered year after the partisan primaries but before the general election.

Every member of a county board of elections shall receive training conducted by the State Board at least once during the six months after the member’s initial appointment and at least once again during the first two years of the member’s service. The
State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for the training of precinct officials, which shall be followed by the county boards of elections.

Certification. — The State Board of Elections shall conduct a program for certification of election officials. The program shall include training in election law and procedures. Before issuing certification to an election official, the State Board shall
administer an examination designed to determine the proficiency of the official in election law and procedures. The State Board shall set adequate standards for the passage of the examination.

History.
1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 2001-319, s. 2(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.25.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-381, s. 19.1, effective January 1, 2014.

History.
1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1044, s. 19(e); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 2009-541, s. 16(a); repealed by 2013-381, s. 19.1, effective January 1, 2014.

§ 163-82.26.
Rule-making authority.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this Article.

History.
1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.27.
Help America Vote Act of 2002.

As used in this Chapter, the term “Help America Vote Act of 2002” means the Help America Vote Act of 2002, Public Law 107-252, 116 Stat. 1666 (2002), codified at 42 U.S.C. §§ 15481-15485. Citations to titles and sections of the Help America Vote Act of
2002 are as they appear in the Public Law. The State Board shall have the authority to adopt rules and guidelines to implement the minimum requirements of the Help America Vote Act of 2002.

History.
2003-226, s. 21; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.28.
The HAVA Election Fund.

There is established a special fund to be known as the Election Fund. All funds received for implementation of the Help America Vote Act of 2002, Public Law 107-252, shall be deposited in that fund. The State Board of Elections shall use funds in the
Election Fund only to implement HAVA.

History.
2003-12, s. 1; 2005-276, s. 23A.2(a); 2005-323, s. 7; 2006-264, s. 76(d); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-83.

Reserved for future codification purposes.